src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-í3ssk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ísska - ok : # -m animate noun, pail AEW NA1
     isska+NA+Sg: ísska
     isska+NA+Pl: ísskiksi
     isska+NA+Obv: ísski
     isska+NA+Non: isskí
     
     isska+NA+Px1Sg+Sg: nóóhkiwa
     isska+NA+Px1Sg+Pl: nóóhkiiksi
     isska+NA+Px1Sg+Obv: nóóhkiyi
     isska+NA+Px1Sg+Non: nóóhkii
     
     isska+NA+Px1Pl+Sg: nóóhkinnaana
     isska+NA+Px1Pl+Pl: nóóhkinnaaniksi
     isska+NA+Px1Pl+Obv: nóóhkinnaani
     isska+NA+Px1Pl+Non: nóóhkinnaani

     isska+NA+Px21Pl+Sg: kóóhkinnoona
     isska+NA+Px21Pl+Pl: kóóhkinnooniksi
     isska+NA+Px21Pl+Obv: kóóhkinnooni
     isska+NA+Px21Pl+Non: kóóhkinnooni

     isska+NA+Px2Sg+Sg: kóóhkiwa
     isska+NA+Px2Sg+Pl: kóóhkiiksi
     isska+NA+Px2Sg+Obv: kóóhkiyi
     isska+NA+Px2Sg+Non: kóóhkii

     isska+NA+Px2Pl+Sg: kóóhkiwaawa
     isska+NA+Px2Pl+Pl: kóóhkiwaawaiksi
     isska+NA+Px2Pl+Obv: kóóhkiwaawayi
     isska+NA+Px2Pl+Non: kóóhkiwaawai

     isska+NA+Px3Sg+Obv: óóhkiyi
     isska+NA+Px3Sg+Pl: óóhkiiksi
     isska+NA+Px3Sg+Non: óóhkii

     isska+NA+Px3Pl+Obv: óóhkiwaawayi
     isska+NA+Px3Pl+Pl: óóhkiwaawaiksi
     isska+NA+Px3Pl+Non: óóhkiwaawai
